Hawaii statutes.
[§201-83] Rules. The department may
adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 for the purposes of this part. [L
1988, c 366, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"Part"
substituted for "chapter".

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next